Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB177.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "public body" in section 2 of the act of December 12, 1986 (P.L.1559, No.169), known as the Whistleblower Law, is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Judicial agency." The Supreme Court and any other court of the Commonwealth or any other entity or office of the unified 1234567891011121314151617181920 judicial system under Article V of the Constitution of Pennsylvania, including the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts."Public body." All of the following:(1) A State officer, agency, department, division, bureau, board, commission, council, authority or other body in the executive branch of State government.(1.1) The General Assembly and its agencies.(1.2) A judicial agency.(2) A county, city, township, regional governing body, council, school district, special district or municipal corporation, or a board, department, commission, council or agency.(3) Any other body which is created by Commonwealth or political subdivision authority or which is funded in any amount by or through Commonwealth or political subdivision authority or a member or employee of that body.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0177PN0116 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819